Utah statutes.
17-19-5.   Numbering of payments -- Payments not presented for collection.

 (1)  Each warrant, check, or other payment mechanism issued during each year, commencing with the 1st day of January, shall be numbered consecutively, and the number, date, and the amount of each, the name of the person to whom payable, and the purpose for which drawn shall be stated thereon. The auditor shall register all payments when they are made.

(2)  Any payment not presented for collection shall be disposed of pursuant to Title 67, Chapter 4a, Unclaimed Property Act.



Amended by Chapter 212, 1996 General Session

